Utah statutes.
9-1-806.   Officers' duties.

(1)  The chair shall:

(a)  preside at all meetings of the commission;

(b)  appoint all subcommittee chairs;

(c)  assist all chairs in the planning of subcommittee activities;

(d)  supervise all chairs as to the management of subcommittee plans;

(e)  authorize and execute the wishes of the commission; and

(f)  serve as an ex officio member of all subcommittees.

(2)  The vice chair shall:

(a)  assist the chair, and, in the absence of the chair, perform those duties;

(b)  accept special assignments from the chair; and

(c)  perform other duties as delegated by the commission.

(3)  The secretary shall:

(a)  keep an updated list of names, addresses, and telephone numbers of all commission and subcommittee members; and

(b)  keep a record of attendance at meetings.

(4)  The treasurer shall:

(a)  oversee the preparation of all funding applications; and

(b)  report on finances to the commission at each meeting.



Enacted by Chapter 119, 1994 General Session

